tex/context/patterns/mkii/lang-pl.hyp
% generated by mtxrun --script pattern --convert

% for comment and copyright, see lang-pl.rme

% used: a b c d e g h i j k l m n o p r s t w y z ó ą ł ż

\hyphenation{
be-zach
be-zami
by-naj-mniej
gdzie-nie-gdzie
ina-czej
na-dal
ni-gdy
ni-gdzie
niech-że
niech-by
ow-szem
pó-łach
pó-łami
pó-łek
pod-ów-czas
przy-naj-mniej
skąd-inąd
tró-jach
tró-jami
tró-jek}
